District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

16-5004

Payment of fees.

Repealed.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-257, § 5, 46 DCR 1309
June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-136, § 203, 47 DCR 2850
1981 Ed., § 16-5004.
Temporary addition of chapter: See note to § 16-5001.
For temporary repeal of chapter, see note to § 16-5001.
For temporary (90-day) repeal of this chapter, see § 3(b) of the Adoption and Safe Families Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-383, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6700).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of this chapter, see § 3(b) of the Adoption and Safe Families Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-451, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9399).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of this chapter, see § 3(b) of Adoption and Safe Families Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-65, June 6, 2001, 48 DCR 5721).